Washington statutes.
RCW 36.27.010

Eligibility to office.

No person shall be eligible to the office of prosecuting attorney in any county of this state, unless he or she is a qualified elector therein, and has been admitted as an attorney and counselor of the courts of this state.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4045; 1963 c 4 s 36.27.010. Prior: 1891 c 55 s 4; RRS s 4128. Cf. 1883 p 72 s 7.]